Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1441.01
Preliminary activity, defined.

Preliminary activity includes conducting a poll or focus group, drafting proposed language, making telephone calls, sending or receiving electronic mail, and traveling in connection with a ballot question.

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 47.
July 18, 2026